Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1683.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6060.3b of Title 36, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. “Contraceptive drugs” means all drugs approved by the United
States Food and Drug Administration that are used to prevent

ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 1683 Page 1

preg nancy, including, but not limited to, hormonal drugs
administered orally, transdermally, and intravaginally.
Contraceptive drugs excludes medications that could be used to
terminate an existing pregnancy; and
2. “Health benefit plan” means a health benefit plan as defined
pursuant to Section 6060.4 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Any health benefit plan that is offered, issued, or renewed
on or after the effective date of this act that offers coverage for
contraceptive drugs shall provide coverage for an enrollee to
obtain:
1. A three-month supply of a contraceptive drug at once the
first time the enrollee obtains the drug; and
2. A six-month supply of the contraceptive drug at once each
subsequent time that the enrollee obtains the same drug, regardless
of whether the enrollee was enrolled in the health benefit plan the
first time that the enrollee obtained the drug.
An enrollee may obtain only one six-month supply of a covered
prescription drug during each six-month period.
C. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an
enrollee of a health benefit plan from requesting a smaller supply
or to prohibit a prescribing provider from prescribing a smaller
supply if such a prescription is supported by clinical utility and
medical appropriateness.

ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 1683 Page 2

D. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require
coverage under a health benefit plan for any contraceptive drug that
is not intended for regular or routine use.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.”
Passed the Senate the 7th day of May, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives











ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 1683 Page 3

ENGR OSSED HOUSE
BILL NO. 1683 By: Roe and Hefner of the House

and

Dossett of the Senate



[ health benefit plans – coverage of prescription –
codification - effective date ]



BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6060.3b of Title 36, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. "Contraceptive drugs" means all drugs approved by the United
States Food and Drug Administration that are used to prevent
pregnancy, including, but not limited to, hormonal drugs
administered orally, transdermally, and intravaginally.
Contraceptive drugs excludes medications that could be used to
terminate an existing pregnancy; and
2. "Health benefit plan" means a health benefit plan as defined
pursuant to Section 6060.4 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1683 Page 1

B. Any health benefit plan that is offered, issued, or renewed
on and after the effective date of this act that offers coverage for
contraceptive drugs shall provide coverage for an enrollee to
obtain:
1. A three-month supply of a contraceptive drug at once the
first time the enrollee obtains the drug; and
2. A twelve-month supply of the contraceptive drug at once each
subsequent time that the enrollee obtains the same drug, regardless
of whether the enrollee was enrolled in the health benefit plan the
first time that the enrollee obtained the drug.
An enrollee may obtain only one twelve-month supply of a covered
prescription drug during each twelve-month period.
C. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an
enrollee of a health benefit plan from requesting a smaller supply
or to prohibit a prescribing provider from prescribing a smaller
supply if such a prescription is supported by clinical utility and
medical appropriateness.
D. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require
coverage under a health benefit plan for any contraceptive drug that
is not intended for regular or routine use.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.



ENGR. H. B. NO. 1683 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 1683 Page 3